North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 1. Bond Anticipation Notes.

§ 159-160.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, the words “unit” or “issuing unit” means “unit of local government” as defined in

G.S. 159-44

or

G.S. 159-102

, “municipality” as defined in

G.S. 159-81

, and the State of North Carolina.

History.

1973, c. 494, s. 36; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1276, s. 9; 1983, c. 554, s. 19; 2003-403, s. 12.

§ 159-161.
Bond anticipation notes.

At any time after a bond order has taken effect and with the approval of the Commission, the issuing unit may borrow money for the purposes for which the bonds are to be issued, in anticipation of the receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, and within the maximum authorized amount of the bond issue. General obligation bond anticipation notes shall be payable not later than seven years after the time the bond order takes effect and shall not be renewed or extended beyond such time, except that, if the issuance of bonds under the bond order is extended by an order of the board of the issuing unit which takes effect pursuant to

G.S. 159-64

, the bond anticipation notes may be renewed and extended and shall be payable not later than 10 years after the time the bond order takes effect and that, if the issuance of bonds under the bond order is prevented or prohibited by any order of any court, the bond anticipation notes may be renewed or extended by the length of time elapsing between the date of institution of the action or proceeding and the date of its final disposition. Any extension of the time for issuing bonds under a bond order granted by act of the General Assembly pursuant to

G.S. 159-64

shall also extend the time for issuing and paying notes under this section for the same period of time.

History.

1917, c. 138, ss. 13, 14; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(13), (14); C.S., ss. 2934, 2935; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 39; 1931, c. 293; 1939, c. 231, s. 1; 1953, c. 693, ss. 2, 4; 1969, c. 687, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 33; 1977, c. 404, s. 1; 1979, c. 444, s. 2.

§ 159-162.
Security of general obligation bond anticipation notes.

The faith and credit of the issuing unit are hereby pledged for the payment of each note issued in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds according to its terms, and the power and obligation of the issuing unit to levy taxes and raise other revenues for the prompt payment of such notes shall be unrestricted as to rate or amount, notwithstanding any other provisions of law. The proceeds of each general obligation bond issue are also hereby pledged for the payment of any notes issued in anticipation of the sale thereof, and any such notes shall be retired from the proceeds of the bonds as the first priority. In the discretion of the governing board, notes issued in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds may be paid from current revenues or other funds instead of from the bond proceeds, but if this is done, the bond order shall be amended to reduce the aggregate authorized principal amount by the amount of the bond anticipation notes and accrued interest thereon. Such an amendment need not be published and shall take effect upon its passage.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-163.
Security of revenue bond anticipation notes.

Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds are hereby declared special obligations of the issuing unit. Neither the credit nor the taxing power of the issuing unit may be pledged for the payment of notes issued in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds, and no holder of a revenue bond anticipation note shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the issuing unit or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon. Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds shall be secured, to the extent and as provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such notes, by a pledge, charge, and lien upon the proceeds of the revenue bonds in anticipation of the sale of which such notes are issued and upon the revenues securing such revenue bonds; provided, however, that such notes shall be payable as to both principal and interest from such revenues if not paid from the proceeds of such revenue bonds or otherwise paid. The provisions of

G.S. 159-90(b)

shall apply to revenue bond anticipation notes as well as to revenue bonds.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1979, c. 428; 1985, c. 265, s. 2.

§ 159-163.1.
Security of project development financing debt instrument anticipation notes.

Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of project development financing debt instruments are special obligations of the issuing unit. Except as provided in

G.S. 159-107

and

G.S. 159-110

, neither the credit nor the taxing power of the issuing unit may be pledged for the payment of notes issued in anticipation of the sale of project development financing debt instruments. No holder of a project development financing debt instrument anticipation note has the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the issuing unit or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default on the note. Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of project development financing debt instruments may be secured by the same pledges, charges, liens, covenants, and agreements made to secure the project development financing debt instruments. In addition, the proceeds of each project development financing debt instrument issue are pledged for the payment of any notes issued in anticipation of the sale of the instruments, and these notes shall be retired from the proceeds of the sale as the first priority.

History.

2003-403, s. 13.

§ 159-164.
Form of notes to be issued.

Bond anticipation loans shall be evidenced by negotiable notes in bearer form or by certificated or uncertificated registered public obligations pursuant to the Registered Public Obligations Act. Such notes and certificated registered public obligations are hereby declared to be investment securities within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State. Bond anticipation notes may be renewed or extended from time to time, but not beyond the time period allowed in

G.S. 159-161

. The governing board may authorize the issuance of bond anticipation notes by resolution which shall fix the maximum aggregate principal amount of the notes and may authorize any officer to fix, within the limitations prescribed by the resolution, the rate of interest, the place or places of payment, and the denomination or denominations of the notes. The notes shall be signed with the manual or facsimile signatures of officers designated by the governing board for that purpose, but at least one manual signature must appear on each note (which may be the signature of the representative of the Commission to the Commission’s certificate). The resolution shall specify the form and manner of execution of the notes.

History.

1917, c. 138, ss. 13, 14; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(13), (14); C.S., ss. 2934, 2935; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 39; 1931, c. 293; 1939, c. 231, s. 1; 1953, c. 693, ss. 2, 4; 1969, c. 687, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 34; 1983, c. 322, s. 9.

§ 159-165.
Sale and delivery of bond anticipation notes.

Bond anticipation notes of a municipality, including special obligation bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to Article 7A of this Chapter, shall be sold by the Commission at public or private sale according to such procedures as the Commission may prescribe. Bond anticipation notes of the State shall be sold by the State Treasurer at public or private sale, upon such terms and conditions, and according to such procedures as the State Treasurer may prescribe.

When the bond anticipation notes are executed, they shall be delivered to the State Treasurer who shall deliver them to the order of the purchaser and collect the purchase price or proceeds. The Treasurer shall then deduct from the proceeds the Commission’s expense in connection with the issue, and remit the net proceeds to the official depository of the unit after assurance that the deposit will be adequately secured as required by law. The net proceeds of revenue bond anticipation notes, special obligation bond anticipation notes, or project development financing debt instrument anticipation notes shall be remitted to the trustee or other depository specified in the trust agreement or resolution securing them. If the notes have been issued to renew outstanding notes, the Treasurer, in lieu of collecting the purchase price or proceeds, may provide for the exchange of the newly issued notes for the notes to be renewed.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 14; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(14); C.S., s. 2935; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 39; 1931, c. 293; 1939, c. 231, s. 1; 1953, c. 693, s. 2; 1969, c. 687, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 35; 1983, c. 554, s. 20; 1989, c. 756, s. 7; 2003-403, s. 14; 2020-3, s. 4.30(h).

§§ 159-166,
159-167.

Reserved for future codification purposes.